Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Chapter 3. Removal of Prisoners

§ 47-3-1.
Removal to jail of another county.

When the accused is not entitled to bail, or where he fails to give bail, and there is no county jail or the jail of the county in which the offense is committed, or where the case stands for trial is, in the opinion of the committing officer or of the court having jurisdiction of the case or of the presiding judge, insufficient for the accommodation of the prisoners, or where the judge having jurisdiction of the case shall think it expedient, on grounds of public policy, so to do, it shall be the duty of the officer of the court, or circuit judge, to make an order for the removal of the accused to a convenient and safe jail of some convenient county, there to be kept until the court shall sit for the trial of the accused. It shall be the duty of the sheriff of the county to which the prisoner is so removed, to receive and safely keep him, according to the order of the court or officer having jurisdiction thereof; and it shall further be the duty of said sheriff to have the body of the accused, without further order, before the proper court of the proper county, at its next term thereafter, on the first day of the term, unless he shall have been discharged by due course of law. The county in which the offense is committed, or where the case stands for trial, shall pay all the expenses of such removal and safekeeping and return of the accused for trial.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 65, art. 2(76); 1857, ch. 64, art. 290; 1871, § 2790; 1880, § 3052; 1892, § 1403; 1906, § 1476; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1234; 1930, § 1256; 1942, § 2499; Laws, 1964, ch. 355; Laws, 1973, ch. 319, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1973).

§ 47-3-3.
No removal after commitment.

A person committed or in custody on a criminal charge shall not be removed from the place of his confinement into the custody of any other officer, unless it be by habeas corpus or some other legal writ, except for trial, or in case of fire or infection, or other necessity, or in accordance with express provision of law. If any person, after such commitment, shall make out or issue any warrant or process for such removal except as authorized, it shall be void.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 65, art. 1(17); 1857, ch. 48, art. 9; 1871, § 1408; 1880, § 3053; 1892, § 1404; 1906, § 1477; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1235; 1930, § 1257; 1942, § 2500.

§ 47-3-5.
Removal to place where convicts may be worked.

It shall be unlawful for any officer, convict manager, or other person to remove any convict to the state farm, county farm, road or other place where convicts may be worked before the expiration of five (5) days from the date of conviction, unless said convict may express himself so ready to go at an earlier date and such consent be entered on the minutes by order of the court. Any officer or other person violating this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) or more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), or be imprisoned in the county jail not less than thirty (30) days or more than six (6) months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp, §§ 1142g, 1142h; 1930, § 1258; 1942, § 2501; Laws, 1918, ch. 245; Laws, 1920, ch. 328.

§ 47-3-7.
Removal in case of infectious or contagious disease.

If any infectious or contagious disease shall appear in the vicinity of any jail, or if the appearance of such disease be apprehended, the board of supervisors of the county, or, if it should not meet in time, the sheriff of the county, with the concurrence of two (2) members of such board, or of a circuit judge or chancellor, expressed in writing, may cause the prisoners confined in such jail to be removed to some suitable place of security, for safekeeping, until the threatened danger shall be over, when they shall be returned to the jail.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 3054; 1892, § 1405; 1906, § 1478; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1236; 1930, § 1259; 1942, § 2502.

§ 47-3-9.
Removal in case of infectious or contagious disease; place where prisoners may be taken.

Removal of prisoners pursuant to Section 47-3-7 may be to some place in the county, or to the jail of another county. The jailer of such other county shall receive the prisoners and keep them safely, and surrender them when called for by the authority of the sheriff of the county from which they were removed. All the expenses of any such removal of prisoners and their imprisonment anywhere else, shall be borne by the county chargeable with the expense of imprisonment and trial of prisoners.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 3055; 1892, § 1406; 1906, § 1479; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1237; 1930, § 1260; 1942, § 2503.

§ 47-3-11.
Transfer of convicted foreign national to country of citizenship.

When a treaty is in effect between the United States of America and a foreign country providing for the transfer of convicted offenders to the country of which they are citizens or nationals, the Governor, on behalf of the State of Mississippi, is authorized, subject to the terms of the treaty, to consent to the transfer of the convicted offender. The Governor is authorized to develop any policies and procedures which may be necessary to carry out the mandates of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 442, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.